California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) For purposes of this section, “floral or ornamental products or services” means floral arrangements, cut flowers, floral bouquets, potted plants, balloons, floral designs, and related products and services.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “local telephone number” means a specific telephone number (area code and prefix) assigned for the purpose of completing local calls between a calling party
 or station and any other party or station within a designated exchange or all of its designated local calling areas. The term “local telephone number” does not include long distance telephone numbers or any toll-free telephone numbers listed in a local telephone directory.

(c) (1) It is an infraction for a provider or vendor of floral or ornamental products or services to misrepresent the geographic location of its business by doing either of the following:

(A) Listing a local telephone number in any advertisement or listing, unless the advertisement or listing identifies the true physical address, including the city, of the provider’s or vendor’s business.

(B) Listing a fictitious business name or an assumed business name in any advertisement or listing if both of the following criteria are
 met:

(i) The name of the business misrepresents the provider’s or vendor’s geographic location.

(ii) The advertisement or listing does not identify the true physical address, including the city and state, of the provider’s or vendor’s business.

(2) Notwithstanding Sections 17534 and 17534.5, a violation of this section is punishable, exclusively, by a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(d) This section does not create or impose any duty or obligation on a person other than a vendor or provider described in subdivision (a).

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A publisher of a
 telephone directory or other publication or a provider of a directory assistance service publishing or providing information about another business.

(2) An Internet Web site that aggregates and provides information about other businesses.

(3) An owner or publisher of a print advertising medium providing information about other businesses.

(4) An Internet service provider.

(5) An Internet service that displays or distributes advertisements for other businesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.

(a) It is unlawful in the sale or lease or offering for sale or lease of goods or services, for any person conducting sales or leases by telephone, the Internet or other electronic means of communication, mail order, or catalog in this state, including, but not limited to, the offering for sale or lease on television, radio, or the Internet, or by any other electronic means of communication or telecommunications device, of goods or services that may be ordered by mail, telephone, the Internet, or other electronic means of communication or
 telecommunications device, or for any person advertising in connection with those sales, leases, or advertisements a mailing address, telephone number, or Internet or other electronic address, to accept payment from or for a buyer, for the purchase or lease of goods or services ordered by mail, telephone, the Internet, or other electronic means of communication or telecommunications device, whether payment to the vendor is made directly, through the mail, by means of a transfer of funds from an account of the buyer or any other person, or by any other means, and then permit 30 days, unless otherwise conspicuously stated in the offering or advertisement, or unless a shorter time is clearly communicated by the person conducting the sale or lease, to elapse without doing any one of the following things:

(1) Shipping, mailing, or providing the goods or services ordered.

(2) Mailing a
 full refund or, if payment was made by means of a transfer from an account, (A) crediting the account in the full amount of the debit, or (B) if a third party is the creditor, issuing a credit memorandum to the third party, who shall promptly credit the account in the full amount of the debit.

(3) Sending the buyer a letter or other written notice (A) advising the buyer of the duration of an expected delay expressed as a specific number of days or weeks, or proposing the substitution of goods or services of equivalent or superior quality, and (B) offering to make a full refund, in accordance with paragraph (2), within one week if the buyer so requests. The vendor shall provide to the buyer in that letter or written notice a toll-free telephone number or other cost-free method to communicate the buyer’s request for a full refund. If the vendor proposes to substitute goods or services, the vendor shall describe the substitute goods or services in
 detail, indicating fully how the substitute differs from the goods or services ordered.

(4) (A) Shipping, mailing, or providing substitute goods or services of equivalent or superior quality, if the buyer is extended the opportunity to return the substitute goods or services and the vendor promises to refund to the buyer (i) the cost of returning the substitute goods or services and (ii) any portion of the purchase price previously paid by the buyer.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), a notice to the buyer shall accompany the mailing, shipping, or providing of the substitute goods or services that informs the buyer of the substitution; describes fully how the substitute differs from the goods or services ordered, except that obvious nontechnical differences, such as color, need not be described; and discloses the buyer’s right to reject the
 substitute goods or services and obtain a full refund of the amount paid, plus the cost of returning the substitute goods or services.

(C) The vendor may omit from the notice required by subparagraph (B) a description of how the substitute goods or services differ from the ordered goods or services if the notice otherwise complies with subparagraph (B), and if all the following requirements are complied with:

(i) The vendor maintains at least 100 retail outlets located in at least 20 counties in this state that are open to the public regularly during normal business hours where buyers can order catalog goods, pick them up, and return them for refunds.

(ii) The vendor maintains a toll-free telephone number and provides to each buyer, at the time of the buyer’s call, a full description of how substitute goods or
 services differ from ordered goods or services. The toll-free telephone number shall operate and be staffed at all times during which goods or services normally are available for pick up from the vendor’s retail outlets.

(iii) If the buyer picks up substitute goods or services from the vendor’s retail outlet, the notice required by subparagraph (B) as modified by this subparagraph is placed on, or attached to, the exterior of the package or wrapping containing the substitute, or is handed to the buyer at the time the buyer picks up the substitute.

(iv) The notice contains a reference number or some other means of identifying the ordered goods or services and the substitute goods or services.

(v) The notice contains the vendor’s toll-free telephone number and instructions to the buyer that the buyer may call that
 number to obtain a full description of how the substitute differs from the ordered goods.

(b) For purposes of paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a), goods or services shall be considered of “equivalent or superior quality” only if they are (1) substantially similar to the goods or services ordered, (2) fit for the usual purposes for which the goods or services ordered are used, and (3) normally offered by the vendor at a price equal to or greater than the price of the goods or services ordered.

(c) When a buyer makes an initial application for an open-end credit plan, as defined in the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1602), at the same time the goods or services are ordered, and the goods or services are to be purchased on credit, the person conducting the business shall have 50 days, rather than 30 days, to perform the actions specified in this
 section.

(d) A vendor conducting business through the Internet or any other electronic means of communication shall do all of the following when the transaction involves a buyer located in this state:

(1) Before accepting any payment or processing any debit or credit charge or funds transfer, the vendor shall disclose to the buyer in writing or by electronic means of communication, such as e-mail or an on-screen notice, the vendor’s return and refund policy, the legal name under which the business is conducted and, except as provided in paragraph (3), the complete street address from which the business is actually conducted.

(2) If the disclosure of the vendor’s legal name and address information required by this subdivision is made by on-screen notice, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The disclosure of the legal name and address information shall appear on any of the following: (i) the first screen displayed when the vendor’s electronic site is accessed, (ii) on the screen on which goods or services are first offered, (iii) on the screen on which a buyer may place the order for goods or services, (iv) on the screen on which the buyer may enter payment information, such as a credit card account number, or (v) for nonbrowser-based technologies, in a manner that gives the user a reasonable opportunity to review that information. The communication of that disclosure shall not be structured to be smaller or less legible than the text of the offer of the goods or services.

(B) The disclosure of the legal name and address information shall be accompanied by an adjacent statement describing how the buyer may receive the information at the buyer’s e-mail address. The
 vendor shall provide the disclosure information to the buyer at the buyer’s e-mail address within five days of receiving the buyer’s request.

(C) Until the vendor complies with subdivision (a) in connection with all buyers of the vendor’s goods or services, the vendor shall make available to a buyer and any person or entity who may enforce this section pursuant to Section 17535 on-screen access to the information required to be disclosed under this subdivision.

(3) The complete street address need not be disclosed as required by paragraph (1) if the vendor utilizes a private mailbox receiving service and all of the following conditions are met: (A) the vendor satisfies the conditions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17538.5, (B) the vendor discloses the actual street address of the private mailbox receiving service in the manner prescribed by this
 subdivision for the disclosure of the vendor’s actual street address, and (C) the vendor and the private mailbox receiving service comply with all of the requirements of subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, of Section 17538.5.

(e) If a buyer is permitted to return goods or cancel a service that he or she purchased or contracted for on or after January 1, 2003, the vendor shall, within 30 days of return of the goods in refundable condition or cancellation of the service and of receipt of sufficient information to enable the vendor to make the refund, including confirmation that the buyer’s payment for the purchase or contract has been paid or cleared by the applicable financial institution, process and send to the buyer any refund due to the buyer as a result of the return or cancellation, or, if the buyer’s payment was made by means of a third-party creditor, the vendor shall issue a credit memorandum to the third party, pursuant to 12 C.F.R.
 226.12(e), within seven business days and the third party shall promptly credit the account in the full amount of the refund.

(f) As used in this section and Section 17538.3, the following words have the following meanings:

(1) “Goods” means tangible chattels, including certificates or coupons exchangeable for those goods, and including goods which, at the time of the sale or subsequently, are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part of that real property, whether or not severable therefrom.

(2) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other group, however organized.

(3) “Buyer” means a person who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods or services for any purpose.

(4) “Services” means work, labor, and services, including services furnished in connection with the sale or repair of goods.

(5) “Vendor” means a person who, as described in subdivision (a), vends, sells, leases, supplies, or ships goods or services, who conducts sales or leases of goods or services, or who offers goods or services for sale or lease. “Vendor” does not include a person responding to an electronic agent in connection with providing goods or services to a buyer if the aggregate amount of all transactions with the buyer does not exceed ten dollars ($10).

(6) “Internet” means the global information system that is logically linked together by a globally unique address space based on the Internet Protocol (IP), or its subsequent extensions, and that is able to support communications using the Transmission
 Control Protocol/Internet Protocol (TCP/IP) suite, or its subsequent extensions, or other IP-compatible protocols, and that provides, uses, or makes accessible, either publicly or privately, high level services layered on the communications and related infrastructure described in this paragraph.

(7) “Electronic agent” means a computer program designed, selected, or programmed to initiate or respond to electronic messages or performances without review by an individual.

(g) Any violation of the provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 326, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.3.

The provisions of Section 17538 do not apply to any of the following, except that subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 17538 shall apply to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section:

(a) To instances in which all advertising for goods or services contains a notice as to each item or service offered, which, in the case of printed advertising, shall be in a type size at least as large as that indicating the price, that a delay may be expected of a specified period. In those cases, one of the
 events described in Section 17538 must occur no later than the expiration of the period specified in the advertisement.

(b) To goods or services, such as quarterly magazines, which by their nature are not ready for use or consumption until a future date and for that reason cannot be stocked at the time of order.

(c) To installments other than the first of goods, such as magazine subscriptions, ordered for serial delivery.

(d) To any telecommunications goods and services sold by a telecommunications company, except those telecommunications goods and services purchased for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(e) To financial services offered in the ordinary course of business by a supervised bank, national banking association, bank
 holding company, a state or federal savings and loan association, a state or federal credit union, or a subsidiary or affiliate thereof, or an authorized industrial loan company, a licensed personal property broker, a licensed consumer finance lender, a licensed commercial finance lender, or a person licensed pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000).

(f) To any delay in delivery of goods or services caused by the United States Postal Service, an act of God, or a labor strike by the vendor’s employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 326, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.35.

(a) Unless otherwise permitted by law or contract, any provider of electronic mail service shall provide each customer with notice at least 30 days before permanently terminating the customer’s electronic mail address.

(b) No contract for electronic mail service may permit termination of service without cause with less than a 30-day notice. For purposes of this subdivision, “termination of service without cause” means termination of service at the
 unfettered discretion of the service provider without regard to any conduct of the customer that violates the service provider’s terms of service or acceptable use policy.

(c) For purposes of this section, “provider” shall mean the entity that controls the customer’s electronic mail address, and not the entity making the underlying network or access available to the provider or the customer.

(d) No provider shall be liable under this section solely for a failure to comply with this section in the event a customer’s electronic mail address is permanently terminated due to the action or inaction of an entity making the underlying network or access available to the provider or the customer.

(e) This section supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances of all cities, counties, cities and
 counties, municipalities, and other local agencies regarding notice of electronic mail termination by providers of electronic mail service.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on the date that a federal law or regulation is enacted that regulates notice requirements in the event of termination of electronic mail service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

17538.41.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e), no person, entity conducting business, candidate, or political committee in this state shall transmit, or cause to be transmitted, a text message advertisement to a mobile telephony services handset, pager, or two-way messaging device that is equipped with short message capability or any similar capability allowing the transmission of text messages. A text message advertisement is a message, the principal purpose of which is to promote the sale of goods
 or services, or to promote a political purpose or objective, to the recipient, and consisting of advertising material for the lease, sale, rental, gift offer, or other disposition of any realty, goods, services, or extension of credit, or advertising material for political purposes.

(2) This section shall apply when a text message advertisement is transmitted to a number assigned for mobile telephony service, pager service, or two-way messaging service to a California resident.

(b) This section shall not apply to text messages transmitted at the direction of a person or entity offering mobile telephony service, pager service, or two-way messaging service if the subscriber is offered an option to not receive those text messages.

(c) This section shall not apply to text messages transmitted by a business, candidate, or
 political committee that has an existing relationship with the subscriber if the subscriber is offered an option not to receive text messages from that business, candidate, or political committee.

(d) This section shall not apply to text messages transmitted by an affiliate of a business that has an existing relationship with the subscriber, but only if the subscriber has provided consent to the business with which he or she has that relationship to receive text messages from affiliates of that business. “Affiliate” means any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another company.

(e) This section shall not apply to electronic mail messages that are forwarded, without the knowledge of the sender, to a mobile telephony services handset, pager, or two-way messaging device.

(f) Subdivision (a) shall not impose an obligation on a person or entity offering mobile telephony service, pager service, or two-way messaging service to control the transmission of a text message unless the message is transmitted at the direction of that person or entity.

(g) For purposes of this section, “mobile telephony service” means commercially available interconnected mobile phone services that provide access to the public switched telephone network (PSTN) via mobile communication devices employing radiowave technology to transmit calls, including cellular radiotelephone, broadband Personal Communications Services (PCS), and digital Specialized Mobile Radio (SMR).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 711, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.43.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Telephone facsimile machine” means equipment that has the capacity to do either or both of the following:

(A) Transcribe text or images, or both, from paper into an electronic signal and to transmit that signal over a regular telephone line.

(B) Transcribe text or
 images, or both, from an electronic signal received over a regular telephone line onto paper.

(2) “Unsolicited advertisement” means any material advertising the commercial availability or quality of any property, goods, or services that is transmitted to any person or entity without that person’s or entity’s prior express invitation or permission. Prior express invitation or permission may be obtained for a specific or unlimited number of advertisements and may be obtained for a specific or unlimited period of time.

(b) (1) It is unlawful for a person or entity, if either the person or entity or the recipient is located within California, to use any telephone facsimile machine, computer, or other device to send, or cause another person or entity to use such a device to send, an unsolicited advertisement to a telephone facsimile machine.

(2) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, including a remedy provided by the Telephone Consumer Act (47 U.S.C. Sec. 227 and following), a person or entity may bring an action for a violation of this subdivision seeking the following relief:

(A) Injunctive relief against further violations.

(B) Actual damages or statutory damages of five hundred dollars ($500) per violation, whichever amount is greater.

(C) Both injunctive relief and damages as set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

If the court finds that the defendant willfully or knowingly violated this subdivision, the court may, in its discretion, increase the amount of the award to an amount equal to not more than three times the amount otherwise
 available under subparagraph (B).

(c) It is unlawful for a person or entity, if either the person or entity or the recipient is located in California, to do either of the following:

(1) Initiate any communication using a telephone facsimile machine that does not clearly mark, in a margin at the top or bottom of each transmitted page or on the first page of each transmission, the date and time sent, an identification of the business, other entity, or individual sending the message, and the telephone number of the sending machine or of the business, other entity, or individual.

(2) Use a computer or other electronic device to send any message via a telephone facsimile machine unless it is clearly marked, in a margin at the top or bottom of each transmitted page of the message or on the first page of the transmission,
 the date and time it is sent and the identification of the business, other entity, or individual sending the message and the telephone number of the sending machine or of the business, other entity, or individual.

(d) This section shall not apply to a facsimile sent by or on behalf of a professional or trade association that is a tax-exempt nonprofit organization and in furtherance of the association’s tax-exempt purpose to a member of the association, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The member voluntarily provided the association the facsimile number to which the facsimile was sent.

(2) The facsimile is not primarily for the purpose of advertising the commercial availability or quality of any property, goods, or services of one or more third parties.

(3) The member who is sent the facsimile has not requested that the association stop sending facsimiles for the purpose of advertising the commercial availability or quality of any property, goods, or services of one or more third parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.45.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following words have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic mail advertisement” means any electronic mail message, the principal purpose of which is to promote, directly or indirectly, the sale or other distribution of goods or services to the recipient.

(2) “Unsolicited electronic mail advertisement” means any electronic mail advertisement that meets both of the following
 requirements:

(A) It is addressed to a recipient with whom the initiator does not have an existing business or personal relationship.

(B) It is not sent at the request of or with the express consent of the recipient.

(3) “Electronic mail service provider” means any business or organization qualified to do business in California that provides registered users the ability to send or receive electronic mail through equipment located in this state and that is an intermediary in sending or receiving electronic mail.

(4) “Initiation” of an unsolicited electronic mail advertisement refers to the action by the initial sender of the electronic mail advertisement. It does not refer to the actions of any intervening electronic mail service provider that may handle
 or retransmit the electronic message.

(5) “Registered user” means any individual, corporation, or other entity that maintains an electronic mail address with an electronic mail service provider.

(b) No registered user of an electronic mail service provider shall use or cause to be used that electronic mail service provider’s equipment located in this state in violation of that electronic mail service provider’s policy prohibiting or restricting the use of its service or equipment for the initiation of unsolicited electronic mail advertisements.

(c) No individual, corporation, or other entity shall use or cause to be used, by initiating an unsolicited electronic mail advertisement, an electronic mail service provider’s equipment located in this state in violation of that electronic mail service provider’s policy
 prohibiting or restricting the use of its equipment to deliver unsolicited electronic mail advertisements to its registered users.

(d) An electronic mail service provider shall not be required to create a policy prohibiting or restricting the use of its equipment for the initiation or delivery of unsolicited electronic mail advertisements.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the rights of an electronic mail service provider under Section 230(c)(1) of Title 47 of the United States Code, any decision of an electronic mail service provider to permit or to restrict access to or use of its system, or any exercise of its editorial function.

(f) (1) In addition to any other action available under law, any electronic mail service provider whose policy on unsolicited
 electronic mail advertisements is violated as provided in this section may bring a civil action to recover the actual monetary loss suffered by that provider by reason of that violation, or liquidated damages of fifty dollars ($50) for each electronic mail message initiated or delivered in violation of this section, up to a maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day, whichever amount is greater.

(2) In any action brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to a prevailing party.

(3) (A) In any action brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the electronic mail service provider shall be required to establish as an element of its cause of action that prior to the alleged violation, the defendant had actual notice of both of the following:

(i) The
 electronic mail service provider’s policy on unsolicited electronic mail advertising.

(ii) The fact that the defendant’s unsolicited electronic mail advertisements would use or cause to be used the electronic mail service provider’s equipment located in this state.

(B) In this regard, the Legislature finds that with rapid advances in Internet technology, and electronic mail technology in particular, Internet service providers are already experimenting with embedding policy statements directly into the software running on the computers used to provide electronic mail services in a manner that displays the policy statements every time an electronic mail delivery is requested. While the state of the technology does not support this finding at present, the Legislature believes that, in a given case at some future date, a showing that notice was supplied via electronic means between
 the sending and receiving computers could be held to constitute actual notice to the sender for purposes of this paragraph.

(4) (A) An electronic mail service provider who has brought an action against a party for a violation under Section 17529.8 shall not bring an action against that party under this section for the same unsolicited commercial electronic mail advertisement.

(B) An electronic mail service provider who has brought an action against a party for a violation of this section shall not bring an action against that party under Section 17529.8 for the same unsolicited commercial electronic mail advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.5.

(a) It is unlawful in the sale or offering for sale of consumer goods or services for any person conducting, any business in this state which utilizes a post office box address, a private mailbox receiving service, or a street address representing a site used for the receipt or delivery of mail or as a telephone answering service, to fail to disclose the legal name under which business is done and, except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the complete street address from which business is actually conducted in all advertising
 and promotional materials, including order blanks and forms. Any violation of the provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(b) (1) This section shall not apply to a person who sells the preponderance of goods and services at retail from trade premises which are open to the public regularly during normal business hours where the post office box or telephone answering service is supportive of and ancillary to the sales made or to any person who provides services pursuant to a license issued pursuant to this code or any other provision of law by a state board or agency or, except for a person conducting a mail order or catalog business, by a city or county or city and county in this state, which has the person’s current business street address or home address on record
 and which is authorized to reveal that address to inquiring persons.

(2) If a person conducts a business described in subdivision (a) from that person’s residence, the person is not required to disclose the residence address if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The person’s current business street address or home address is contained in a United States Postal Service (USPS) Form 1583 that is filed with the USPS.

(B) The person has signed an acknowledgement form substantially in accordance with the provisions set forth in subdivision (f) which, among other things, authorizes the commercial mail receiving agency to act as that person’s agent for service of process.

(c) A commercial mail receiving agency (CMRA) shall not provide private
 mailbox receiving service to any customer until it obtains from that customer at least two pieces of identification regarding that customer and provides to that customer an acknowledgment, as set forth in subdivision (f), which (1) acknowledges the obligation to advise the CMRA of any change in address, (2) authorizes the CMRA to act as an agent for service of process, and (3) acknowledges the requirements of Sections 17200 and 17500, which prohibit unfair competition and false advertising. The commercial mail receiving agency shall thereafter maintain a copy of any United States Postal Service Form 1583 for each mailbox service customer, along with a copy of each of the two pieces of identification used by the customer, for a period of two years after the termination of service to that customer. Upon the request of the Department of Consumer Affairs or any law enforcement agency conducting an investigation, the commercial mail receiving agency shall make available to the Department of Consumer Affairs or
 that law enforcement agency, for purposes of that investigation and copying, its copy of the United States Postal Service Form 1583 and the two pieces of identification used by the customer.

(d) (1) Every person receiving private mailbox receiving service from a CMRA in this state shall be required to sign an agreement, along with a USPS Form 1583, which authorizes the CMRA owner or operator to act as agent for service of process for the mail receiving service customer. Every CMRA owner or operator shall be required to accept service of process for and on behalf of any of their mail receiving service customers, and for two years after termination of any mail receiving service customer agreement. Upon receipt of any process for any mailbox service customer, the CMRA owner or operator shall (A) within 48 hours after receipt of any process, place a copy of the documents or a notice that the documents were received into the
 customer’s mailbox or other place where the customer usually receives his or her mail, unless the mail receiving service for the customer was previously terminated, and (B) within five days after receipt, send all documents by first-class mail, to the last known home or personal address of the mail receiving service customer. The CMRA shall obtain a certificate of mailing in connection with the mailing of the documents. Service of process upon the mail receiving service customer shall then be deemed perfected 10 days after the date of mailing.

If the CMRA owner or operator has complied with the foregoing requirements and provides to any party participating in a lawsuit involving a mail receiving service customer a declaration of service by mail, given under penalty of perjury along with a certificate of mailing, the CMRA owner or operator shall have no further liability in connection with acting as agent for service of process for its mail receiving service
 customer.

(2) Upon complaint or inquiry concerning any CMRA mail receiving service customer, the CMRA owner or operator shall inform the person making the complaint or inquiry that the CMRA is an authorized agent for service of process on the mail receiving service customer.

(3) Upon presentation of a certified copy of a judgment, the CMRA shall disclose to the judgment creditor the last known address of any of its mail receiving service customers against whom the judgment was obtained.

(e) An owner or operator of a CMRA who, acting in good faith, contacts a governmental agency concerning suspected illegal or fraudulent activities carried out by a mail receiving service customer shall have no liability for claims filed by the customer arising out of that contact. No owner or operator of a commercial mail receiving
 agency that maintains on file a copy of the United States Postal Service Form 1583 for its private mailbox receiving service customers and complies with subdivision (c) shall be liable for any illegal acts of any mail receiving service customer based only on the fact that the owner or operator of the CMRA provided mail receiving services to the customer.

(f) The following acknowledgement and notice, substantially in the form set forth below, shall be delivered to each person obtaining private mailbox receiving service at a CMRA:

“ACKNOWLEDGEMENT BY PRIVATE MAILBOX SERVICE CUSTOMERS

This acknowledgement is required by Section 17538.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

Any person obtaining private mailbox receiving service in the State of California must read and acknowledge receipt of the following
 statement, which is to be kept on file at this CMRA and will be made available, upon demand, to the Department of Consumer Affairs or any law enforcement agency conducting an investigation.

By requesting and obtaining use of a private mailbox receiving service in the State of California, I acknowledge that:

1. I am obligated to disclose my actual home address or place of residence on a USPS Form 1583 or other form as may later be developed and I further agree that I will provide prompt written notice to this CMRA of any subsequent change in my home address or place of residence.

2. By signing below, I irrevocably authorize this CMRA to act as my agent for service of process to receive any legal documents that may be served upon me. This authorization shall continue from the date of this agreement until two years after my mail receiving
 service has been terminated. I understand that this CMRA will (A) place a copy of the documents or a notice that the documents were received into my mailbox or other place where I usually receive my mail, unless my mail receiving service has been terminated, and (B) send all documents by first-class mail to the home or other address last known to the CMRA.

3. I further acknowledge that I understand that use of a private mailbox receiving service for commercial purposes in the State of California requires the user to comply with all applicable laws, including Section 17538.5 of the Business and Professions Code and laws prohibiting unfair competition and false advertising as set forth in Sections 17200 and 17500 of the Business and Professions Code. Violation of these laws may result in criminal or civil penalties or both. I understand that the United States Postal Service Form 1583 that must be prepared for each private mailbox receiving
 service customer shall be delivered to the local United States Post Office and a copy of the form must be retained by this CMRA and made available upon demand to the Department of Consumer Affairs or any law enforcement agency conducting an investigation. I hereby agree to accept and abide by the foregoing requirements.DateSignatureName PrintedStreet AddressCityStateZip”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.6.

(a) It is unlawful for any person conducting business in this state to require or request a consumer to issue a postdated check unless (1) the person accepting the check advises the consumer in writing that the check may be cashed immediately, notwithstanding the postdating, unless the consumer files a postdating order with the consumer’s bank pursuant to Section 4401 of the Commercial Code, and (2) either of the following occurs:

(A) Receipt of the advice is acknowledged by the
 consumer in writing.

(B) The advice is clearly printed on an invoice for goods or services that is provided to the consumer at the same time that the check is solicited.
